Nebraska, session 109, LB1061.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1061 LB1061
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 85-502, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-502 Rules and regulations established by the governing board of
each state postsecondary educational institution shall require as a
minimum that a person is not deemed to have established a residence in
this state, for purposes of sections 85-501 to 85-504, unless:
(1) Such person is of legal age or is an emancipated minor and has
established a home in Nebraska where he or she is habitually present for
a minimum period of one hundred eighty days, with the bona fide intention
of making this state his or her permanent residence, supported by
documentary proof;
(2) The parents, parent, or guardian having custody of a minor
registering in the educational institution have established a home in
Nebraska where such parents, parent, or guardian are or is habitually
present with the bona fide intention to make this state their, his, or
her permanent residence, supported by documentary proof. If a student has
matriculated in any state postsecondary educational institution while his
or her parents, parent, or guardian had an established home in this
state, and the parents, parent, or guardian ceases to reside in the
state, such student shall not thereby lose his or her resident status if
such student has the bona fide intention to make this state his or her
permanent residence, supported by documentary proof;
(3) Such student is of legal age and is a dependent for federal
income tax purposes of a parent or former guardian who has established a
home in Nebraska where he or she is habitually present with the bona fide
intention of making this state his or her permanent residence, supported
by documentary proof;
(4) Such student is a nonresident of this state prior to marriage
and marries a person who has established a home in Nebraska where he or
she is habitually present with the bona fide intention of making this
state his or her permanent residence, supported by documentary proof;
-2-

LB1061 LB1061
2026 2026
(5) Such Except as provided in subdivision (9) of this section, such
student, if an alien, has applied to or has a petition pending with the
United States Immigration and Naturalization Service to attain lawful
status under federal immigration law and has established a home in
Nebraska for a period of at least one hundred eighty days where he or she
is habitually present with the bona fide intention to become a lawful
permanent resident of the United States and make this state his or her
permanent residence, supported by documentary proof;
(6) Such student is a staff member or a dependent of a staff member
of the University of Nebraska, one of the Nebraska state colleges, or one
of the community college areas who joins the staff immediately prior to
the beginning of a term from an out-of-state location;
(7)(a) Such student is on active duty with the armed services of the
United States and has been assigned a permanent duty station in Nebraska;
or
(b) Such student is a spouse or legal dependent of a person who was
on active duty with the armed services of the United States assigned to a
permanent duty station in Nebraska at the time such student was accepted
for admission to the state postsecondary educational institution and such
student remains continually enrolled at such state postsecondary
educational institution;
(8) Such student is currently serving in the Nebraska National
Guard; or
(9)(a) Such student resided with his or her parent, guardian, or
conservator while attending a public, private, denominational, or
parochial high school in this state or a school in this state which
elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not to meet accreditation or approval
requirements and:
(i) Graduated from a public, private, denominational, or parochial
high school in this state, completed the program of instruction offered
by a school in this state which elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not to
-3-

LB1061 LB1061
2026 2026
meet accreditation or approval requirements, or received a diploma of
high school equivalency issued pursuant to section 79-730;
(ii) Resided in this state for at least three years before the date
the student graduated from the high school, completed the program of
instruction, or received the diploma of high school equivalency;
(iii) Registered as an entering student in a state postsecondary
educational institution not earlier than the 2006 fall semester; and
(iv) Provided to the state postsecondary educational institution an
affidavit stating that he or she will file an application to become a
permanent resident at the earliest opportunity he or she is eligible to
do so.
(b) If the parent, guardian, or conservator with whom the student
resided ceases to reside in the state, such student shall not lose his or
her resident status under this subdivision if the student has the bona
fide intention to make this state his or her permanent residence,
supported by documentary proof; or
(9) (10) Such student is qualified for a national service
educational award or summer of service educational award from the
National Service Trust pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 12602, as such section
existed on January 1, 2021.
Sec. 2. Original section 85-502, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-